Illinois, session 104th, HB3709.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Higher Education Act is amended by 5changing Section 5 and by adding Sections 19 and 20 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 167/5)7    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "Contraception" means medication or medical devices used 9to prevent pregnancy. 10    "Emergency contraception" means medication approved by the 11federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA) that can 12significantly reduce the risk of pregnancy if taken within 72 13hours after unprotected sexual intercourse.14    "Governing board of each public institution of higher 15education" means the Board of Trustees of the University of 16Illinois, the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois 17University, the Board of Trustees of Chicago State University, 18the Board of Trustees of Eastern Illinois University, the 19Board of Trustees of Governors State University, the Board of 20Trustees of Illinois State University, the Board of Trustees 21of Northeastern Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of 22Northern Illinois University, the Board of Trustees of Western 23Illinois University, the board of trustees of each community   HB3709 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10311 LNS 20385 b1college district in this State, and the governing board of any 2other public university, college, or community college now or 3hereafter established or authorized by the General Assembly.4    "Medication abortion" means termination of pregnancy by 5use of medication. 6    "Primary care services" has the meaning given to that term 7in Section 10 of the Equity and Representation in Health Care 8Act. 9    "Public institution of higher education" means the 10University of Illinois, Southern Illinois University, Chicago 11State University, Eastern Illinois University, Governors State 12University, Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois 13University, Northern Illinois University, Western Illinois 14University, a public community college in this State, or any 15other public university, college, or community college now or 16hereafter established or authorized by the General Assembly.17    "Student health services" means any clinic, facility, or 18program operated by or affiliated with a public institution of 19higher education intending to provide primary care services to 20enrolled students of the public institution of higher 21education.22    "Wellness kiosk" means a mechanical device used for retail 23sales of wellness products that may include, but is not 24limited to, prophylactics, menstrual cups, tampons, menstrual 25pads, pregnancy tests, and nonprescription drugs. A wellness 26kiosk must also include discounted emergency contraception.  HB3709 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10311 LNS 20385 b1(Source: P.A. 103-465, eff. 8-4-23.) 2    (110 ILCS 167/19 new)3    Sec. 19. Medication contraception availability on campus.4    (a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each public 5institution of higher education with student health services 6shall provide enrolled students with access to one or more 7health care professionals whose scopes of practice 8collectively include prescribing and dispensing contraception 9to patients in this State. These health care professionals 10shall be available to discuss contraception options, prescribe 11contraception as needed, including both medication and 12procedural-based forms of contraception, and dispense 13contraception. This service shall be provided through student 14health services, telehealth services, or other external 15licensed providers.16    (b) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, if a public 17institution of higher education's student health services 18includes a pharmacy, the pharmacy on campus shall dispense 19contraception to enrolled students who wish to fill their 20prescriptions at that pharmacy. A student may choose to fill 21the student's prescription at a third-party pharmacy.22    (c) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each public 23institution of higher education with student health services 24shall make available, on the public institution of higher 25education's student health services' website, information on   HB3709 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10311 LNS 20385 b1how students can access medication contraception on campus. 2    (d) Each public institution of higher education shall 3report annually to the Board of Higher Education that policies 4under this Section have been adopted. This may be included in 5an existing report. The Board of Higher Education shall 6annually post, on its website, each public institution of 7higher education's compliance with the policies under this 8Section.  9    (110 ILCS 167/20 new)10    Sec. 20. Medication abortion availability on campus.11    (a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each public 12institution of higher education with student health services 13shall provide enrolled students with access to one or more 14health care professionals whose scopes of practice include 15prescribing medication abortion to patients in this State. 16These health care professionals shall be available to discuss 17abortion options and prescribe medication abortion as needed. 18This service shall be provided through student health 19services, telehealth services, or other external licensed 20providers.21    (b) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, if a public 22institution of higher education's student health services 23includes a pharmacy, the public institution of higher 24education shall make medication abortion available at a 25physical location on campus. Enrolled students shall be able   HB3709 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10311 LNS 20385 b1to access medication abortion at either a pharmacy on campus, 2the student health center via a health care professional 3licensed to dispense medication abortion, or another physical 4location on campus where students access other similar 5medications. A student may choose to fill the student's 6prescription at a third-party pharmacy.7    (c) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each public 8institution of higher education with student health services 9shall make available, on the public institution of higher 10education's student health services' website, information on 11how students can access medication abortion on campus. 12    (d) Each public institution of higher education shall 13report annually to the Board of Higher Education that policies 14under this Section have been adopted. This may be included in 15an existing report. The Board of Higher Education shall post 16annually, on its website, each public institution of higher 17education's compliance with the policies under this Section. 18    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 19severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.